Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,112
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 14-384 to 14-3,127 shall be construed as in any way abridging, modifying, or limiting the authority or right granted to and now possessed by any city as provided by law to improve any road, highway, or boulevard leading into such city for a distance not to exceed six miles from the corporate limits of such city, nor as modifying the procedure under such grant or the power or authority to issue bonds in connection with such improvements, but such authority is hereby expressly recognized and the power so granted by law shall not be subject to any of the limitations contained in sections 14-384 to 14-3,127.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 29, p. 206;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 116.